Washington statutes.
RCW 11.135.100

Retention of electronic record.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, if other law of this state requires an electronic nontestamentary estate planning document to be retained, transmitted, copied, or filed, the requirement is satisfied by retaining, transmitting, copying, or filing an electronic record that:

(a) Accurately reflects the information in the document after it was first generated in final form as an electronic record or under RCW 11.135.110; and

(b) Remains accessible to the extent required by the other law.

(2) A requirement under subsection (1) of this section to retain a record does not apply to information the sole purpose of which is to enable the record to be sent, communicated, or received.

(3) If other law of this state requires a nontestamentary estate planning document to be presented or retained in its original form, or provides consequences if a nontestamentary estate planning document is not presented or retained in its original form, an electronic record retained in accordance with subsection (1) of this section satisfies the other law.

(4) This section does not preclude a governmental agency from specifying requirements for the retention of a record subject to the agency's jurisdiction in addition to those in this section. In this subsection, "governmental agency" means an executive, legislative, or judicial agency, department, board, commission, authority, institution, or instrumentality of the federal government or of a state or of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of a state.

[ 2024 c 188 s 11.]